Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1741
Collection of taxes; contract for or purchase of warrants or orders at discount by treasurer, forbidden; penalty.

No county, city, township or village treasurer shall either directly or indirectly contract for or purchase any warrant or order or orders issued by the county of which he is treasurer at any discount whatever upon the sum due on such warrant or order or orders. If any county, city, township or village treasurer shall so contract for or purchase any such order or warrant, he shall not be allowed in settlement the amount of the order or warrant, or any part thereof, and shall also forfeit the whole amount due on such order or warrant, to be recovered by civil action, at the suit of the State of Nebraska, for the use of the school fund of the county.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 168, p. 451;

R.S.1913, § 6496;

C.S.1922, § 6024;

C.S.1929, § 77-1929;

R.S.1943, § 77-1741.